Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1919
Religious corporations; constitutional protections.

If religious doctrine governing the affairs of a religious corporation is inconsistent with the provisions of the Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation Act on the same subject, the religious doctrine shall control to the extent required by the Constitution of the United States or the Constitution of the State of Nebraska or both.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 19.